California, session 20252026, AB810.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 50034 of the Government Code is amended to read:50034. (a) (1) (A) No later than January 1, 2029, a local agency city, county, or city and county that maintains an internet website for use by the public shall ensure that the internet website uses a “.gov” top-level domain or a “.ca.gov” second-level domain.(2)(B) If a local agency city, county, or city and county that is subject to paragraph (1) subparagraph (A) maintains an internet website for use by the public that is noncompliant with paragraph (1) subparagraph (A) by January 1, 2029, that local agency city, county, or city and county shall redirect that internet website to a domain name that does comply with paragraph (1). subparagraph (A).(b)(2) No later than January 1, 2029, a local agency city, county, or city and county that maintains public email addresses for its employees shall ensure that each email address provided to its employees uses a “.gov” domain name or a “.ca.gov” domain name.(b) (1) (A) Except as otherwise provided in paragraphs (3) and (4), no later than January 1, 2031, a special district, joint powers authority, or other political subdivision that maintains an internet website for use by the public shall ensure that the internet website uses a “.gov” top-level domain or a “.ca.gov” second-level domain.(B) If a special district, joint powers authority, or other political subdivision that is subject to subparagraph (A) maintains an internet website for use by the public that is noncompliant with subparagraph (A) by January 1, 2031, that special district, joint powers authority, or other political subdivision shall redirect that internet website to a domain name that does comply with subparagraph (A).(2) Except as otherwise provided in paragraphs (3) and (4), no later than January 1, 2031, a special district, joint powers authority, or other political subdivision that maintains public email addresses for its employees shall ensure that each email address provided to its employees uses a “.gov” domain name or a “.ca.gov” domain name.(c)(3) For purposes of this section, subdivision, a community college district or community college may use a “.edu” domain name.(d)For purposes of this section, “local agency” means a city, county, city and county, special district, school district, joint powers authority, or other political subdivision.(4) This subdivision shall not apply to a K–12 public school district.SEC. 2. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.